ko: 관현악 현악기 부속품/부품 유형: 브리지; 브리지 어저스터; C 페그(첼로 페그 익스텐션); 턱받침; 코너/엔드 블록; 엔드핀; 미세 튜너; 지판; 너트; 페그 셰이버/리머(교체용 블레이드/부품); 립/플레이트 피팅(수리용 클리트/패치); 새들; 사운드포스트; 테일거트; 테일피스; 테일피스 프렛; 튜닝 페그; 울프 엘리미네이터; 기타
tr: Orkestra yaylı çalgı parça/bağlantı tipi: Köprü; Köprü ayarlayıcıları; Do (C) burgusu (çello burgu uzantısı); Çenelik; Köşe/Uç takozu; Kuyruk dikeni; İnce akort vidası; Klavye (Tuşe); Üst eşik; Burgu tıraşlayıcı/rayba (yedek bıçaklar/parçalar); Yanlık/Kapak montajı (onarım takozları/yamaları); Alt eşik; Can direği; Kuyruk bağı; Kuyruk; Kuyruk eşiği; Akort burguları; Kurt sesi (wolf) giderici; Diğer
es: Tipo de pieza o accesorio para instrumento de cuerda orquestal: Puente; Ajustadores de puente; Clavija de Do (extensión de clavija para violonchelo); Mentonera; Bloque de esquina/extremo; Pica; Afinador de precisión; Diapasón; Cejilla; Afilador/escariador de clavijas (cuchillas de repuesto/piezas); Ajuste de costilla/placa (tacos/parches de reparación); Selleta; Alma; Cordón de tiracuerdas; Cordal; Traste de cordal; Clavijas de afinación; Eliminador de lobo; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe/peça de instrumento de cadeia orquestral: Cavalete; Afinadores de cavalete; Cravelha C (extensão de cravelha de violoncelo); Queixeira; Bloco de canto/extremidade; Espigão; Microafinador; Escala; Pestana; Apara-cravelhas/escareador (lâminas/peças de substituição); Faixa/tampo (cunhas/remendos de reparação); Rastilho; Alma; Fio de estandarte; Estandarte; Traste de estandarte; Cravelhas de afinação; Eliminador de lobo; Outro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ประกอบหรือชิ้นส่วนของเครื่องดนตรีสากลประเภทเครื่องสาย: หย่อง; ตัวปรับหย่อง; ลูกบิด C (ตัวต่อลูกบิดเชลโล); ที่รองคาง; บล็อกมุม/ปลาย; เอ็นพิน (หมุดปลาย); ตัวปรับเสียงละเอียด; ฟิงเกอร์บอร์ด; นัท; เครื่องมือเหลา/ขยายรูปัก (ใบมีด/อะไหล่เปลี่ยน); การติดตั้งซี่โครง/แผ่น (ซ่อมแผ่นยึด/ปะ); หย่องล่าง; ซาวด์โพสต์; สายโยงหางปลา; หางปลา; เฟรตหางปลา; ลูกบิดตั้งเสียง; ตัวขจัดเสียงหอน (Wolf eliminator); อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva/súčiastky sláčikového nástroja: Kobylka; Nastavovače kobylky; Ladiaci kolík C (predĺženie kolíka pre violončelo); Podbradník; Rohový/koncový špalík; Bodec; Jemný dolaďovač; Hmatník; Nultý pražec; Strúhadlo/výstružník na kolíky (náhradné čepele/diely); Kovanie lubu/dosky (opravné príchytky/záplaty); Sedlo; Duša; Záves na strunník; Strunník; Pražec na strunníku; Ladiace kolíky; Eliminátor vlka; Iné
it: Tipo di componente/accessorio per strumenti ad arco: Ponte; Regolatori per ponticello; Piolo Do (estensione piolo violoncello); Mentoniera; Zocchetto; Puntale; Tiracantino; Tastiera; Capotasto; Temperapiroli/alesatore (lame/parti di ricambio); Raccordo fasce/tavola (tacchetti/toppe di riparazione); Selletta; Anima; Laccio per cordiera; Cordiera; Capotasto della cordiera; Piroli; Anti-lupo; Altro
vi: Loại phụ kiện/bộ phận cho nhạc cụ dây dàn nhạc: Ngựa đàn; Bộ điều chỉnh ngựa đàn; Chốt C (cần mở rộng chốt cello); Đệm cằm; Khối góc/khối cuối; Chân chống; Ốc tinh chỉnh; Bàn phím; Lược đàn; Dao gọt/Mũi doa chốt đàn (lưỡi dao/phụ tùng thay thế); Phụ kiện sườn/mặt đàn (kẹp/miếng vá sửa chữa); Yên đàn; Trụ âm; Dây nối đuôi đàn; Đuôi đàn; Phím đuôi đàn; Chốt chỉnh âm; Bộ triệt âm Wolf; Khác
da: Type af fitting eller del til orkesterstrengeinstrument: Stol; Stolejusterere; C-skrue (forlængelse af celloskrue); Hagestøtte; Hjørne-/endeblok; Endestift; Finstemmer; Gribebræt; Oversadel; Skruefræser/rival (udskiftningsblade/-dele); Zarg-/pladetilpasning (reparationskiler/-lapper); Bundsadel; Lydpind; Hængesnor (til strengeholder); Strengeholder; Strengeholderbånd; Stemmeskruer; Ulvetone-dæmper; Andet
fi: Orkesterikielisoittimen sovitin/osatyyppi: Talla; Tallan säätimet; C-tappi (sellon tapin jatke); Leukatuki; Kulma-/päätypala; Piikki; Hienoviritin; Otelauta; Satula; Tapin teroitin/kalvain (vaihtoterät/-osat); Sarjan/kannen sovitus (korjauspalat/paikat); Kielenpidikkeen kynnys; Äänipinna; Kielenpidikkeen kiinnityslanka; Kielenpidike; Kielenpidikkeen nauha; Viritystapit; Susivaimennin; Muu
fr: Type de pièce ou d’accessoire pour instrument à cordes d’orchestre: Chevalet; Ajusteurs de chevalet; Cheville de Do (extension de cheville de violoncelle); Mentonnière; Coin/Tasseau; Pique; Tendeur; Touche; Sillet; Taille-cheville/Alésoir (lames/pièces de rechange); Ajustement d’éclisse/de plaque (taquets/pièces de réparation); Sillet du bas; Âme; Attache-cordier; Cordier; Frette de cordier; Chevilles d’accordage; Anti-loup; Autre
en: Orchestral string instrument fitting/part type: Bridge; Bridge adjusters; C-peg (cello peg extension); Chinrest; Corner/End block; Endpin; Fine tuner; Fingerboard; Nut; Peg shaver/reamer (replacement blades/parts); Rib/Plate fitting (repair cleats/patches); Saddle; Soundpost; Tailgut; Tailpiece; Tailpiece fret; Tuning pegs; Wolf eliminator; Other
zh-TW: 管弦樂弦樂器配件/零件類型: 琴橋; 琴橋調節器; C-peg (大提琴弦軸延長線); 腮托; 側板/尾塊; 尾柱; 微調器; 指板; 上弦枕; 削軸器/絞刀 (替換刀片/零件); 側板/面板配件 (修復用木釘/補丁); 尾枕; 音柱; 拉弦板繩; 拉弦板; 拉弦板音格; 弦軸; 狼音消除器; 其他
ja: オーケストラストリング楽器のフィッティング／パーツの種類: ブリッジ; ブリッジアジャスター; Cペグ (チェロ用ペグエクステンション); あご当て; コーナー/エンドブロック; エンドピン; ファインチューナー; 指板; ナット; ペグシェーバー/リーマー (交換用刃/パーツ); 横板/表裏板のフィッティング (修理用クリート/パッチ); サドル; 魂柱; テールガット; テールピース; テールピースフレット; チューニングペグ; ヴォルフキラー; その他
lt-LT: Orkestrinio styginio instrumento detalės / dalies tipas: Tilstelis; Tilstelio reguliatoriai; C-kuoliukas (violončelės kuoliuko prailgintuvas); Pasmakrė; Kampinis / galinis blokelis; Atraminis strypas; Tikslaus derinimo mašinėlė; Grifas; Slenkstelis; Kuoliukų drožtukas / plėstuvas (keičiami ašmenys / dalys); Šonikaulio / plokštės tvirtinimas (taisymo elementai / lopai); Balnelis; Dūšelė; Stygų laikiklio kilpa; Stygų laikiklis; Stygų laikiklio slenkstelis; Derinimo kuoliukai; „Vilko“ garso slopintuvas; Kita
ru: Тип фурнитуры или детали оркестрового струнного инструмента: Подставка; Регуляторы подставки; Колок С (удлинитель колка виолончели); Подбородник; Угловой/концевой клец; Шпиль/пуговка; Машинка точной подстройки; Гриф; Порожек; Точилка для колков/развертка (запасные лезвия/детали); Крепление обечайки/деки (ремонтные сухари/накладки); Нижний порожек; Душка; Петля подгрифка; Подгрифок; Порожек подгрифка; Колки; Волчкоудалитель; Другое
pl: Ciąg znaków orkiestrowych typu mocowania/części instrumentu: Mostek; Regulatory mostka; Kołek C (przedłużenie kołka wiolonczeli); Podbródek; Klocek narożny/końcowy; Kolec; Mikrostroik; Podstrunnica; Siodełko; Temperówka/rozwiertak do kołków (ostrza/części wymienne); Mocowanie boczku/płyty (łatki naprawcze); Prożek dolny; Dusza; Folga; Strunociąg; Próg strunociągu; Kołki stroikowe; Tłumik wilka; Inne
sv: Typ av beslag/del för orkesterstränginstrument: Stall; Stalljusterare; C-pinne (förlängning av cellopinne); Hakstöd; Hörn-/ändkloss; Stackel; Finstämmare; Greppbräda; Sadel; Pinnvässare/brotsch (reservblad/delar); Sarg-/lockmontering (lagningsklossar/lappar); Sadel; Ljudpinne; Stränghållarhänge; Stränghållare; Stränghållarsadel; Stämskruvar; Vargtondämpare; Övrigt
cs: Typ příslušenství/součásti orchestrálního smyčcového nástroje: Kobylka; Seřizovače výšky kobylky; C-kolíček (extenze na violoncello); Podbradek; Rohový/koncový špalík; Bodec; Dolaďovač; Hmatník; Nultý pražec; Struhadlo/výstružník na kolíčky (náhradní čepele/díly); Lub/deska (opravné spojky/záplaty); Sedlový pražec; Duše; Závěs struníku; Struník; Pražec struníku; Ladicí kolíčky; Eliminátor vlka; Ostatní
nb: Tilbehør/deltype for orkesterstrengeinstrument: Stol; Justerere for stol; C-stemmeskrue (forlengelse av celloskrue); Hakestøtte; Hjørne-/endeblokk; Endepinn; Finstemmer; Gripebrett; Oversadel; Skruehøvel/brotsj (reserveblader/deler); Tilpasning av sarg/lokk (reparasjonskiler/lapper); Sadel; Lydstolpe; Strengholdersnor; Strengholder; Bånd for strengholder; Stemmeskruer; Ulvetone-eliminator; Annet
bg-BG: Тип монтаж/част за оркестров струнен инструмент: Магаре; Регулатори на магарето; C-ключ (разширение на ключа за виолончело); Подбрадник; Ъглово/крайно трупче; Шип; Машинка за фина настройка; Гриф; Горно магаре; Инструмент за оформяне на ключове (резервни остриета/части); Сглобяване на царги/плочи (ремонтни шини/кръпки); Долно магаре; Душичка; Връв за струнник; Струнник; Прагче на струнника; Ключове за настройване; Елиминатор на вълчи тонове; Друго
pt-BR: Instrumento de cordas orquestral acessório/peça tipo: Cavalete; Ajustadores de cavalete; Cravelha C (extensão de cravelha de violoncelo); Queixeira; Bloco de canto/extremidade; Espigão; Microafinador; Espelho; Pestana; Apontador/alargador de cravelha (lâminas/peças de reposição); Encaixe de faixa/tampo (tacos/remendos de reparo); Rastilho; Alma; Rabicho; Estandarte; Traste do estandarte; Cravelhas; Eliminador de lobo; Outros
nl: Orkestraal snaarinstrument fitting-/onderdeeltype: Brug; Brugverstellers; C-sleutel (cello-sleutelextensie); Kinhouder; Hoek-/eindblok; Staartpen; Fijnstemmer; Toets; Topkam; Schroevenslijper/-ruimer (vervangende snijbladen/onderdelen); Krans/boven- en achterblad-fitting (reparatieklemmen/-patches); Zadel; Stapel; Snaarhouderlus; Snaarhouder; Snaarhouderzadel; Stemschroeven; Wolfdoder; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta orkestralnog niz instrumenta/dijela: Konjić; Podešivači konjića; C-vijak (produžetak vijka za violončelo); Podbradak; Kutni/završni blok; Nogica; Podešivač za fino ugađanje; Hvataljka; Sedlo; Strugač/razvrtalo za vijke (zamjenske oštrice/dijelovi); Okovi za bočnicu/ploču (klinovi/zakrpe za popravak); Donje sedlo; Dušica; Držač kordara; Kordar; Prag kordara; Vijci za ugađanje; Eliminator vučjeg tona; Ostalo
el: Ορχηστρική συμβολοσειρά instrument fitting/part type: Καβαλάρης; Ρυθμιστές καβαλάρη; Κλειδί C (προέκταση κλειδιού τσέλου); Υποσιάγωνο; Τάκος γωνίας/άκρου; Ποδαράκι; Μικροκουρδιστήρι; Ταστιέρα; Nut; Ξύστρα/Γλύφανο κλειδιών (ανταλλακτικές λεπίδες/εξαρτήματα); Προσαρμογή πλαϊνών/καπακιού (κομμάτια/επιθέματα επισκευής); Κάτω καβαλάρης; Ψυχή; Σύρμα χορδιέρας; Χορδιέρα; Τάστο χορδιέρας; Κλειδιά κουρδίσματος; Αποσβεστήρας "λύκου"; Άλλο
de: Typ des Beschlags bzw. Teils für Orchesterstreichinstrumente: Steg; Stegschrauben; C-Wirbel (Cello-Wirbelverlängerung); Kinnhalter; Eck-/Endklotz; Stachel; Feinstimmer; Griffbrett; Sattel; Wirbelschneider/Reibahle (Ersatzklingen/-teile); Zargen-/Plattenanpassung (Reparaturklötzchen/-flicken); Untersattel; Stimmstock; Saitenhalter-Hängesaite; Saitenhalter; Saitenhalterbund; Stimmwirbel; Wolftöter; Sonstige
zh-CN: 管弦乐器配件/零件类型: 琴桥; 琴桥调节器; C 弦弦轴（大提琴弦轴延长件）; 腮托; 角木/尾木; 尾针; 微调器; 指板; 弦枕; 弦轴削刀/铰刀（替换刀片/零件）; 侧板/面板配件（维修防裂木片/补片）; 尾枕; 音柱; 尾绳; 拉弦板; 拉弦板弦枕; 弦轴; 狼音消除器; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu/piesă pentru instrumente cu coarde de orchestră: Căluș; Ajustoare pentru căluș; Cheie C (extensie cheie violoncel); Suport pentru bărbie; Butuc de colț/capăt; Picior de sprijin; Acordor fin; Tastieră; Prăguș; Ascuțitoare/alezor pentru chei (lame/piese de schimb); Fiting eclisă/placă (piese de reparație/plasturi); Prăguș inferior; Pop; Fir cordar; Cordar; Tastă cordar; Chei de acordaj; Atenuator note wolf; Altele
hu: Vonós hangszer alkatrészének/szerelékének típusa: Húrláb; Húrlábállítók; C-kulcs (cselló kulcs toldat); Álltartó; Sarok-/zárótőke; Tüske; Finomhangoló; Fogólap; Felső nyereg; Kulcsfaragó/dörzsár (cserepengék/alkatrészek); Káva/tető illesztés (javítóék/folt); Alsó nyereg; Lélek; Húrtartó hurok; Húrtartó; Húrtartó perem; Hangolókulcsok; Farkashang-szűrő; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta opreme/dela za orkestralne strunske instrumente: Kobilica; Nastavki za kobilico; Vijak C (podaljšek za violončelo); Podbradnik; Kotni/končni blok; Nogica; Fini uglaševalec; Ubiralka; Sedlo; Šilček/povrtalo za vijake (nadomestna rezila/deli); Okovje za obod/ploščo (reparativne zaponke/obliži); Spodnje sedlo; Duša; Zanka za strunik; Strunik; Prečka strunika; Vijaki za uglasitev; Odstranjevalec volčjega tona; Drugo